Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.336

Motorized foot scooter.

"Motorized foot scooter" means a device with two or three wheels that has handlebars, a floorboard that can be stood upon while riding, and is powered by an internal combustion engine or electric motor that has a maximum speed of no greater than twenty miles per hour on level ground.

For purposes of this section, a motor-driven cycle, a moped, an electric-assisted bicycle, or a motorcycle is not a motorized foot scooter.

[ 2019 c 170 s 1; 2009 c 275 s 3; 2003 c 353 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 353: See note following RCW 46.04.320.